Hawaii statutes.
[§421J-3] Board of directors. (a)
Every member of the board of directors shall be a member of the association.
However, a developer may appoint or elect directors pursuant to any special
voting rights or power of appointment reserved to the master developer.

(b) The board of directors shall be composed
of the number and group of persons specified in the association documents.
There shall not be more than one representative on the board of directors from
any one unit that is owned by any person other than the master developer or
declarant. [L 1997, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next